California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22087.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) “Committee” means the Blue Ribbon Committee for the Rehabilitation of Clear Lake.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22089.

(a) The committee shall consist of at least nine members and shall include the following representatives:

(1) A representative from the University of California, Davis, to be appointed by the chancellor from the university.

(2) One member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of
 Lake or a designee appointed by the board of supervisors who is either an employee of the county or a resident of the county.

(3) Representatives from the tribes in the communities impacted by Clear Lake, to be appointed by their respective tribal councils.

(4) The secretary of the agency or
 his or her designee.

(5) A representative from the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board, to be appointed by that board.

(6) An expert from each of the following areas, to be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Lake:

(A) Local economic development.

(B) Agriculture.

(C) Environment.

(D) A public water supplier that draws its drinking water supply from Clear Lake. 

(b) The members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of their respective
 appointing powers.

(c) The members shall serve without compensation, but each of the members shall be reimbursed for his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties.

(d) The chairperson of the committee shall be the secretary of the agency, or his or her designee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22090.

Members of the committee shall meet quarterly for the purposes of discussion, reviewing research, planning, and providing oversight regarding the health of Clear Lake. Research conducted for the committee shall go through a scientific and applied science process. Two meetings per year shall be held in the County of Lake.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22091.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2019, the committee shall provide an annual report on its activities to the Governor and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature relating to natural resources and local government.

(b) The first annual report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall identify barriers to improved water quality in Clear Lake, the contributing factors causing the poor water quality, and the threats to wildlife. The report shall include recommendations on solutions to these issues, estimates of cost, and a plan for involving the local, state, and federal governments in funding for and implementation of lake restoration activities.

(c) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22092.

(a) The committee may receive assistance and funds from public and private sources.

(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the committee may expend funds and award grants to conduct research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. ENERGY CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT [25000. - 25997.7.]



CHAPTER 1. Title and General Provisions [25000. - 25009.]

25000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Warren-Alquist State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.1.

(a) The Legislature further finds and declares that, in addition to their other ratepayer protection objectives, a principal goal of electric and natural gas utilities’ resource planning and investment shall be to minimize the cost to society of the reliable energy services that are provided by natural gas and electricity, and to improve the environment and to encourage the diversity of energy sources through improvements in energy efficiency and development of renewable energy resources, such as wind, solar, and geothermal energy.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that, in addition to any appropriate investments in energy production, electrical and natural gas utilities should seek to exploit all practicable and cost-effective conservation and improvements in the efficiency of energy use and distribution that offer equivalent or better system reliability, and which are not being exploited by any other entity. 

(c) In calculating the cost effectiveness of energy resources, including conservation and load management options, the commission shall include a value for any costs and benefits to the environment, including air quality. The commission shall ensure that any values it develops pursuant to this section are consistent with values developed by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 701.1 of the Public Utilities Code. However, if the commission determines that a value developed pursuant to this subdivision is not consistent with a value developed by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 701.1 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission may nonetheless use this value if, in the appropriate record of its proceedings, it states its reasons for using the value it has selected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1475, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25000.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that overdependence on the production, marketing, and consumption of petroleum based fuels as an energy resource in the transportation sector is a threat to the energy security of the state due to continuing market and supply uncertainties. In addition, petroleum use as an energy resource contributes substantially to the following public health and environmental problems: air pollution, acid rain, global warming, and the degradation of California’s marine environment and fisheries.

(b) Therefore, it is the policy of this state to fully evaluate the economic and environmental costs of petroleum use, and the economic and environmental costs of other transportation fuels, including the costs and values of environmental impacts, and to establish a state transportation energy policy that results in the least environmental and economic cost to the state. In pursuing the “least environmental and economic cost” strategy, it is the policy of the state to exploit all practicable and cost-effective conservation and improvements in the efficiency of energy use and distribution, and to achieve energy security, diversity of supply sources, and competitiveness of transportation energy markets based on the least environmental and economic cost.

(c) It is also the policy of this state to minimize the economic and environmental costs due to the use of petroleum-based and other transportation fuels by state agencies. In implementing a least-cost economic and environmental strategy for state fleets, it is the policy of the state to implement practicable and cost-effective measures, including, but not necessarily limited to, the purchase of the cleanest and most efficient automobiles and replacement tires, the use of alternative fuels in its fleets, and other conservation measures.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “petroleum based fuels” means fuels derived from liquid unrefined crude oil, including natural gas liquids, liquefied petroleum gas, or the energy fraction of methyl tertiary-butyl ether (MTBE) or other ethers that is not attributed to natural gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 912, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that electrical energy is essential to the health, safety and welfare of the people of this state and to the state economy, and that it is the responsibility of state government to ensure that a reliable supply of electrical energy is maintained at a level consistent with the need for such energy for protection of public health and safety, for promotion of the general welfare, and for environmental quality protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the present rapid rate of growth in demand for electric energy is in part due to wasteful, uneconomic, inefficient, and unnecessary uses of power and a continuation of this trend will result in serious depletion or irreversible commitment of energy, land and water resources, and potential threats to the state’s environmental quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in planning for future electrical generating and related transmission facilities state, regional, and local plans for land use, urban expansion, transportation systems, environmental protection, and economic development should be considered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.

The Legislature further finds and declares that there is a pressing need to accelerate research and development into alternative sources of energy and into improved technology of design and siting of power facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.2.

The Legislature further finds that cogeneration technology is a potential energy resource and should be an important element of the state’s energy supply mix. The Legislature further finds that cogeneration technology can assist meeting the state’s energy needs while reducing the long-term use of conventional fuels, is readily available for immediate application, and reduces negative environmental impacts. The Legislature further finds that cogeneration technology is important with respect to the providing of a reliable and clean source of energy within the state and that cogeneration technology should receive immediate support and commitment from state government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.3.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Advanced transportation technologies hold the promise of conserving energy, reducing pollution, lowering traffic congestion, and promoting economic development and jobs in California.

(b) There is a pressing need to provide business assistance to California companies engaged in producing and commercializing advanced transportation technologies.

(c) It is the policy of the state to provide financial assistance to California companies, particularly small businesses, that are engaged in commercial efforts in the field of advanced transportation technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.

The Legislature further finds and declares that prevention of delays and interruptions in the orderly provision of electrical energy, protection of environmental values, and conservation of energy resources require expanded authority and technical capability within state government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares that information should be acquired and analyzed by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission in order to ascertain future energy problems and uncertainties, including, but not limited to:

(a) The state’s role in production of oil from domestic reserves, especially within Petroleum Administration for Defense District V.

(b) The production of Alaskan North Slope oil and its projected use in the state.

(c) Plans of the federal government for development of oil in the Outer Continental Shelf adjacent to the state.

(d) Impacts of petroleum price increases and projected conservation measures on the demand for energy and indirect effects on the need for offshore oil development and Alaskan oil delivery into the state.

(e) Potential shipment of Alaskan oil through the state.

(f) Proposals for processing petroleum outside the state to supply the needs within the state.

(g) The impact on the state of national energy policies, including Project Independence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25006.

It is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to establish and consolidate the state’s responsibility for energy resources, for encouraging, developing, and coordinating research and development into energy supply and demand problems, and for regulating electrical generating and related transmission facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25007.

It is further the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to employ a range of measures to reduce wasteful, uneconomical, and unnecessary uses of energy, thereby reducing the rate of growth of energy consumption, prudently conserve energy resources, and assure statewide environmental, public safety, and land use goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25008.

It is further the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to promote all feasible means of energy and water conservation and all feasible uses of alternative energy and water supply sources.

The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California has extensive physical and natural resources available to it at state-owned sites and facilities which can be substituted for traditional energy supplies or which lend themselves readily to the production of electricity or water. Due to increases in energy and water costs, the state’s expenditures for energy and water have also increased, adding to the burden on California taxpayers and reducing the amount of funds available for other public purposes. 

It is in the best interest of the state to use these resources when it can be demonstrated that long-term cost, water, and energy use reduction will result, and where increased independence from other fuel and water sources and development of additional revenues for the state may be obtained. 

Therefore, in recognition of recent and projected increases in the cost of energy and water from traditional sources, it is the policy of the state to use available resources at state facilities which can substitute for traditional energy and water supplies or produce electricity or water at its facilities when use or production will reduce long-term energy or water expenditures. Criteria used in analysis of proposed actions shall include lifecycle cost evaluation, benefit to taxpayers, reduced fossil fuel or reduced water consumption depending on the application, and improved efficiency. Energy or water facilities at state-owned sites shall be scaled to produce optimal system efficiency and best economic advantage to the state. Energy or water produced may be reserved by the state to meet state facility needs or may be sold to state or nonstate purchasers. 

Resources and processes which may be used to substitute for traditional energy and water supplies and for the purpose of electrical generation at state facilities include, but are not limited to, cogeneration, biomass, wind, geothermal, vapor compression, water reclamation, and solar technologies. 

It is the intent of the Legislature that no policy in this section, expressed or implied, be in conflict with existing state or federal regulations regarding the production or sale of electricity or water, and that this policy be just and reasonable to utility ratepayers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1142, Sec. 7.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

25009.

The Legislature finds and declares that Chapter 854 of the Statutes of 1996 restructured the California electricity industry and created a competitive electricity generation market. In a competitive generation market, the recovery by powerplant owners of their private investment and operating costs is at risk and no longer guaranteed through regulated rates. Before the California electricity industry was restructured, the regulated cost recovery framework for powerplants justified requiring the commission to determine the need for new generation, and site only powerplants for which need was established. Now that powerplant owners are at risk to recover their investments, it is no longer appropriate to make this determination. It is necessary that California both protect environmental quality and site new powerplants to ensure electricity reliability, improve the environmental performance of the current electricity industry and reduce consumer costs. The success of California’s restructured electricity industry depends upon the willingness of private capital to invest in new powerplants. Therefore, it is necessary to modify the need for determination requirements of the state’s powerplant siting and licensing process to reflect the economics of the restructured electricity industry and ensure the timely construction of new electricity generation capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [25100. - 25142.]

25100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.

“Applicant” means any person who submits an application for certification pursuant to the provisions of this division, including, but not limited to, any person who explores for or develops geothermal resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

“Application” means any request for certification of any site and related facility filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this division. An applicant for a geothermal powerplant and related facilities may propose more than one site and related geothermal facilities in the same application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

“Coastal zone” means the “coastal zone” as defined in Section 30103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.3.

“Suisun Marsh” means the Suisun Marsh, as defined in Section 29101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.7.

“Jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission” means the area defined in Section 66610 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

“Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

“Construction” means onsite work to install permanent equipment or structure for any facility. “Construction” does not include any of the following:

(a) The installation of environmental monitoring equipment.

(b) A soil or geological investigation.

(c) A topographical survey.

(d) Any other study or investigation to determine the environmental acceptability or feasibility of the use of the site for any particular facility.

(e) Any work to provide access to a site for any of the purposes specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25106.

“Public advisor” means the public advisor employed by the commission pursuant to Section 25217.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 2.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25107.

“Electric transmission line” means any electric powerline carrying electric power from a thermal powerplant located within the state to a point of junction with any interconnected transmission system. “Electric transmission line” does not include any replacement on the existing site of existing electric powerlines with electric powerlines equivalent to such existing electric powerlines or the placement of new or additional conductors, insulators, or accessories related to such electric powerlines on supporting structures in existence on the effective date of this division or certified pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25108.

“Electric utility” means any person engaged in, or authorized to engage in, generating, transmitting, or distributing electric power by any facilities, including, but not limited to, any such person who is subject to the regulation of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25109.

“Energy” means work or heat that is, or may be, produced from any fuel or source whatsoever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25110.

“Facility” means any electric transmission line or thermal powerplant, or both electric transmission line and thermal powerplant, regulated according to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.

“Account” means the Energy Resources Programs Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1067, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

25112.

“Member” or “member of the commission” means a member of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission appointed pursuant to Section 25200.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25113.

“Notice” means the notice of intent, as further defined in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500), which shall state the intention of an applicant to file an application for certification of any site and related facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25114.

“Interested party” means any person whom the commission finds and acknowledges as having a real and direct interest in any proceeding or action carried on, under, or as a result of the operation of, this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25115.

“Equivalent certification program” means a program, as further defined in Section 25540.5, administered by a county and approved by the commission, which may substitute for the site and related facility certification procedures established pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25116.

“Person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, limited liability company, or company. “Person” also includes any city, county, public district or agency, the state or any department or agency thereof, and the United States to the extent authorized by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25117.

“Plan” means the Emergency Load Curtailment and Energy Distribution Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25118.

“Service area” means any contiguous geographic area serviced by the same electric utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25119.

“Site” means any location on which a facility is constructed or is proposed to be constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25120.

“Thermal powerplant” means any stationary or floating electrical generating facility using any source of thermal energy, with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more, and any facilities appurtenant thereto. Exploratory, development, and production wells, resource transmission lines, and other related facilities used in connection with a geothermal exploratory project or a geothermal field development project are not appurtenant facilities for the purposes of this division.

“Thermal powerplant” does not include any wind, hydroelectric, or solar photovoltaic electrical generating facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

25121.

“Fuel” means petroleum, crude oil, petroleum product, coal, natural gas, or any other substance used primarily for its energy content.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25122.

“Gas utility” means any person engaged in, or authorized to engage in, distributing or transporting natural gas, including, but not limited to, any such person who is subject to the regulation of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25123.

“Modification of an existing facility” means any alteration, replacement, or improvement of equipment that results in a 50-megawatt or more increase in the electric generating capacity of an existing thermal powerplant or an increase of 25 percent in the peak operating voltage or peak kilowatt capacity of an existing electric transmission line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25124.

“Major oil producer” means any person who produces oil in amount determined by the commission as having a major effect on energy supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25125.

“Major natural gas producer” means any person who produces natural gas in amounts determined by the commission as having a major effect on energy supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25126.

“Major marketer” means any person who sells natural gas or oil in amounts determined by the commission as having a major effect on energy supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25127.

“Refiner” means any person who owns, operates, or controls the operations of one or more refineries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25128.

“Refinery” means any industrial plant, regardless of capacity, processing crude oil feedstock and manufacturing oil products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25129.

“Foreign” means any area exclusive of the 50 states and the District of Columbia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

25130.

“Nonresidential” building means any building which is heated or cooled in its interior, and is of an occupancy type other than Type H, I, or J, as defined in the Uniform Building Code, 1973 edition, as adopted by the International Conference of Building Officials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

25131.

“Residential building” means any hotel, motel, apartment house, lodginghouse, single- and dwelling, or other residential building which is heated or mechanically cooled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

25132.

“Load management” means any utility program or activity that is intended to reshape deliberately a utility’s load duration curve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

25133.

“Geothermal element” means an element of a county general plan consisting of a statement of geothermal development policies, including a diagram or diagrams and text setting forth objectives, principles, standards, and plan proposals, including a discussion of environmental damages and identification of sensitive environmental areas, including unique wildlife habitat, scenic, residential, and recreational areas, adopted pursuant to Section 65303 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25134.

“Cogeneration” means the sequential use of energy for the production of electrical and useful thermal energy. The sequence can be thermal use followed by power production or the reverse, subject to the following standards:

(a) At least 5 percent of the cogeneration project’s total annual energy output shall be in the form of useful thermal energy.

(b) Where useful thermal energy follows power production, the useful annual power output plus one-half the useful annual thermal energy output equals not less than 42.5 percent of any natural gas and oil energy input.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 952, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

25135.

“Conversion” means the processes by which residue is converted to a more usable energy form, including, but not limited to, combustion, anaerobic digestion, and pyrolysis, and is used for heating, process heat applications, and electric power generation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 579.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25136.

“Residue” means any organic matter left as residue, such as agricultural and forestry residue, including, but not limited to, conifer thinnings, dead and dying trees, commercial hardwood, noncommercial hardwoods and softwoods, chaparral, burn, mill, agricultural field, and industrial residues, and manure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

25140.

“Solar thermal powerplant” means a thermal powerplant in which 75 percent or more of the total energy output is from solar energy and the use of backup fuels, such as oil, natural gas, and coal, does not, in the aggregate, exceed 25 percent of the total energy input of the facility during any calendar year period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 965, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

25141.

“Unbranded,” as applied to fuel, means gasoline and diesel fuel sold for wholesale or retail distribution to consumers without proprietary additives or marketing under a brand name or trademark owned or controlled by an independent refiner or an integrated refining and marketing company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25142.

“Destination facility” means any structure, group of structures, equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, that receives oil in bulk to or from a tank vessel, railroad car, or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing, handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk. For purposes of this section, a destination facility does not include any railroad car, motor vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the highways or rail lines of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 770, Sec. 7.   (AB 936)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission [25200. - 25235.]

25200.

There is in the Resources Agency the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, consisting of five members appointed by the Governor subject to Section 25204.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25201.

One member of the commission shall have a background in the field of engineering or physical science and have knowledge of energy supply or conversion systems; one member shall be an attorney and a member of the State Bar of California with administrative law experience; one member shall have background and experience in the field of environmental protection or the study of ecosystems; one member shall be an economist with background and experience in the field of natural resource management; and one member shall be from the public at large.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25202.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency and the President of the Public Utilities Commission shall be ex officio, nonvoting members of the commission, whose presence shall not be counted for a quorum or for vote requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25203.

Each member of the commission shall represent the state at large and not any particular area thereof, and shall serve on a full-time basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25204.

The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission within 30 days after the effective date of this division. Every appointment made by the Governor to the commission shall be subject to the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25205.

(a) No person shall be a member of the commission who, during the two years prior to appointment on the commission, received any substantial portion of his or her income directly or indirectly from any electric utility, or who engages in sale or manufacture of any major component of any facility. A member of the commission shall not be employed by any electric utility, applicant, or, within two years after he or she ceases to be a member of the commission, by any person who engages in the sale or manufacture of any major component of any facility.

(b) Except as provided in Section 25202, the members of the commission shall not hold any other elected or appointed public office or
 position.

(c) The members of the commission and all employees of the commission shall comply with all applicable provisions of Section 19251 of the Government Code.

(d) A person who is a member or employee of the commission shall not participate personally and substantially as a member or employee of the commission, through decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, the rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise, in a judicial or other proceeding, hearing, application, request for a ruling, or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, study, plan, or other particular matter in which, to his or her knowledge, he or she, his or her spouse, minor child, or partner, or any organization, except a governmental agency or educational or research institution qualifying as a nonprofit organization under state or federal income tax law, in which he or she is serving, or
 has served as officer, director, trustee, partner, or employee while serving as a member or employee of the commission or within two years prior to his or her appointment as a member of the commission, has a direct or indirect financial interest.

(e) A person who is a partner, employer, or employee of a member or employee of the commission shall not act as an attorney, agent, or employee for any person other than the state in connection with any judicial or other proceeding, hearing, application, request for a ruling, or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, study, plan, or other particular matter in which the commission is a party or has a direct and substantial interest.

(f) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the Attorney General finds that the interest of the member or employee of the commission is not so substantial as to be deemed likely to affect
 the integrity of the services which the state may expect from the member or employee.

(g) Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a felony and shall be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(h) The amendment of subdivision (d) of this section enacted by the 1975–76 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 559.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

25206.

The terms of office of the members of the commission shall be for five years, except that the members first appointed to the commission shall classify themselves by lot so that the term of office of one member shall expire at the end of each one of the five years following the effective date of this division. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor within 30 days of the date on which a vacancy occurs for the unexpired portion of the term in which it occurs or for any new term of office.

If the Governor fails to make an appointment for any vacancy within such 30-day period, the Senate Rules Committee may make the appointment to fill the vacancy for the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurred or for any new term of office, subject to the provisions of Section 25204.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25207.

(a) The members of the commission shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Each member of the commission shall receive the necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. When necessary, the members of the commission and its employees may travel within or outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 3.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25208.

(a) By March 1, 2022, and by each March 1 thereafter, until March 1, 2027, the commission shall submit a report to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee describing programmatic activities and spending pursuant to the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program.

(b) The report shall include both of the following:

(1) A description of any changes to guidelines and budget.

(2) A summary of past spending, activities funded, and expected changes in funding and activities for the next year.

(c) As part of
 the report, the commission may include information that is already provided in reports submitted to and approved by the Public Utilities Commission, as applicable.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 27.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25209.
